Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-10,125
Home services permit; owner; liability.

The owner of each salon holding a home services permit shall have full responsibility for ensuring that the home services are provided in compliance with all applicable laws and rules and regulations and shall be liable for any violations which occur.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 125;

Laws 1995, LB 83, § 51;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3,164;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 387.